Hawaii statutes.
§174-4 Interested members of the board or
employees. No member of the board of land and natural resources or
employees of the board shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any
land or water facility or project or in any property, included or planned to be
included in any facility or project, nor shall any member of the board or
employee of the board have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or
proposed contract, for materials or services to be furnished or used in
connection with any land or water facility or project. If any member of the
board or employee of the board owns or controls an interest, direct or
indirect, in any property included or planned to be included in any land or
water facility or project, the member of the board or employee of the board
shall immediately disclose the same in writing to the board and the disclosure
shall be entered upon the minutes of the board. The member of the board or
employee shall be immediately disqualified from taking any part in the action
of the board relative to the land or water facility or project. Failure to so
disclose the interest shall constitute misconduct in office. [L 1961, c 166, pt
of §3; Supp, §86-4; HRS §174-4; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 306, §5]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next